apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
    <pardef n="инвентив/ен__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ен</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>на</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>но</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ни</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="кра/ен__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ен</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јна</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јно</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јни</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ко/ј__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ј</l>
          <r>ј<s n="adj"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ја</l>
          <r>ј<s n="adj"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>ј<s n="adj"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>ј<s n="adj"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- предлози -->

    <pardef n="и__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="в__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="pr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="не__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="како__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__не">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>не</l>
	  <r>не<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r/>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Expectative particle, used in the construction of the future
         and the conditional -->
    <pardef n="C__ќе">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="part"/><s n="exp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


 </pardefs>

   <e lm="ќе"><i>ќе</i><par n="C__ќе"/></e>
   <e lm="вака"><i>вака</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="така"><i>така</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="онака"><i>онака</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="никако"><i>никако</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="некако"><i>некако</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="редум"><i>редум</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="молкум"><i>молкум</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="весело"><i>весело</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="смешно"><i>смешно</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="тешко"><i>тешко</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="тажно"><i>тажно</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="тмурно"><i>тмурно</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="толку"><i>толку</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="олку"><i>олку</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="оволку"><i>оволку</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="малку"><i>малку</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="доста"><i>доста</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="веќе"><i>веќе</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="двојно"><i>двојно</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="овде"><i>овде</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="некаде"><i>некаде</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="долу"><i>долу</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="дома"><i>дома</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="далеку"><i>далеку</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="ниско"><i>ниско</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="назад"><i>назад</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="десно"><i>десно</i><par n="како__adv"/></e>
   <e lm="краен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>кра</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="траен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>тра</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="таен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>та</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="значаен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>знача</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="очаен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>оча</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="ненаден"><par n="P__adj"/><i>ненад</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="јубилеен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>јубиле</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="трофеен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>трофе</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="развоен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>разво</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="пороен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>поро</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="троен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>тро</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="престоен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>престо</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="постоен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>посто</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="претстоен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>претсто</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="неславен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>неслав</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="секојдневен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>секојднев</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="креативен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>креатив</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="радиоактивен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>радиоактив</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="тековен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>теков</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="врховен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>врхов</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="угледен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>углед</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="слободен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>слобод</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="предходен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>предход</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="тиражен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>тираж</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="јужен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>јуж</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="нервозен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>нервоз</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="социјален"><par n="P__adj"/><i>социјал</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="интегрален"><par n="P__adj"/><i>интеграл</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="венчален"><par n="P__adj"/><i>венчал</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="обиколен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>обикол</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="вкупен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>вкуп</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="камерен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>камер</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="црномурен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>црномур</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="победоносен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>победонос</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="летен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>лет</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="корпулентен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>корпулент</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="млечен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>млеч</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="хроничен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>хронич</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="блискоисточен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>блискоисточ</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="утрешен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>утреш</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="пристанишен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>пристаниш</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
<e lm="одбранбен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>одбранб</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="во"><i>во</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="за"><i>за</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="кај"><i>кај</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="на"><i>на</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="од"><i>од</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="до"><i>до</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="со"><i>со</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="без"><i>без</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="околу"><i>околу</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="по"><i>по</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="зад"><i>зад</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="како"><i>како</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="крај"><i>крај</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="место"><i>место</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="накај"><i>накај</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="наспроти"><i>наспроти</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="низ"><i>низ</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="оданде"><i>оданде</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="освен"><i>освен</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="под"><i>под</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="помеѓу"><i>помеѓу</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="посред"><i>посред</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="пред"><i>пред</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="преку"><i>преку</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="против"><i>против</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="среде"><i>среде</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="спроти"><i>спроти</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="со"><i>со</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
   <e lm="и"><i>и</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
   <e lm="а"><i>а</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
   <e lm="или"><i>или</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
   <e lm="па"><i>па</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="скраја"><i>скраја</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="отсега"><i>отсега</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="сегдека"><i>сегдека</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="одведнашка"><i>одведнашка</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="вјасана"><i>вјасана</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="неодамна"><i>неодамна</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="утредента"><i>утредента</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="напред"><i>напред</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="отаде"><i>отаде</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="зле"><i>зле</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="одгоре"><i>одгоре</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="одненадеж"><i>одненадеж</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="навистински"><i>навистински</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="поземи"><i>поземи</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ѓоамити"><i>ѓоамити</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="тек-тук"><i>тек-тук</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="навером"><i>навером</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ликум"><i>ликум</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="простум"><i>простум</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="отспрвин"><i>отспрвин</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="брго"><i>брго</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ничко"><i>ничко</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="чујно"><i>чујно</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="наполно"><i>наполно</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="сутро"><i>сутро</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="поштозашто"><i>поштозашто</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="опет"><i>опет</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="понатаму"><i>понатаму</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
